Illinois, session 104th, SB199.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Roadside Memorial Act is amended by 5changing Sections 20 and 23.1 as follows: 6    (605 ILCS 125/20)7    Sec. 20. DUI memorial markers. 8    (a) A DUI memorial marker erected before July 1, 2021 9shall consist of a white on blue panel bearing the message 10"Please Don't Drink and Drive". A DUI memorial marker erected 11on or after July 1, 2021 shall consist of a white on blue panel 12bearing the message "Don't Drive Under the Influence". At the 13request of the qualified relative, a separate panel bearing 14the words "In Memory of (victim's name)", followed by the date 15of the crash that was the proximate cause of the loss of the 16victim's life, shall be mounted below the primary panel. This 17amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly does not require 18the removal or replacement of any memorial markers erected 19before July 1, 2021. 20    (b) A DUI memorial marker may memorialize more than one 21victim who died as a result of the same DUI-related crash. If 22one or more additional DUI crash deaths subsequently occur in 23close proximity to an existing DUI memorial marker, the   SB0199- 2 -LRB104 06067 LNS 16100 b1supporting jurisdiction may use the same marker to memorialize 2the subsequent death or deaths, by adding the names of the 3additional persons. 4    (c) A DUI memorial marker shall be maintained permanently 5for at least 4 years from the date the last person was 6memorialized on the marker.7    (d) The supporting jurisdiction has the right to install a 8marker at a location other than the location of the crash or to 9relocate a marker due to restricted room, property owner 10complaints, interference with essential traffic control 11devices, safety concerns, or other restrictions. In such 12cases, the sponsoring jurisdiction may select an alternate 13location.14    (e) The Department shall secure the consent of any 15municipality before placing a DUI memorial marker within the 16corporate limits of the municipality.17    (f) A fee in an amount to be determined by the supporting 18jurisdiction may be paid in whole or in part from the Roadside 19Memorial Fund if moneys are made available by the Department 20of Transportation from that Fund or may be charged to the 21qualified relative to the extent moneys from that Fund are not 22made available. The fee shall not exceed the costs associated 23with the fabrication, installation, and maintenance of the DUI 24memorial marker.25(Source: P.A. 102-60, eff. 7-9-21; 103-82, eff. 1-1-24.)   SB0199- 3 -LRB104 06067 LNS 16100 b1    (605 ILCS 125/23.1)2    Sec. 23.1. Fatal crash memorial marker program.3    (a) The fatal crash memorial marker program is intended to 4raise public awareness of traffic fatalities caused by 5reckless driving or other means by emphasizing the dangers 6while affording families an opportunity to remember the 7victims of traffic crashes.8    (b) As used in this Section, "fatal crash memorial marker" 9means a marker on a highway in this State commemorating one or 10more persons who died as a proximate result of a crash caused 11by a driver who committed an act of reckless homicide in 12violation of Section 9-3 or 9-3.2 of the Criminal Code of 1961 13or the Criminal Code of 2012 or who otherwise caused the death 14of one or more persons through the operation of a motor 15vehicle. 16    (c) For purposes of the fatal crash memorial marker 17program in this Section, the provisions of Section 15 of this 18Act applicable to DUI memorial markers shall apply the same to 19fatal crash memorial markers. 20    (d) A fatal crash memorial marker shall consist of a white 21on blue panel bearing the message "Reckless Driving Costs 22Lives" if the victim or victims died as a proximate result of a 23crash caused by a driver who committed an act of reckless 24homicide in violation of Section 9-3 or 9-3.2 of the Criminal 25Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012. Otherwise, a fatal 26crash memorial marker shall consist of a white on blue panel   SB0199- 4 -LRB104 06067 LNS 16100 b1bearing the message "Drive With Care". At the request of the 2qualified relative, a separate panel bearing the words "In 3Memory of (victim's name)", followed by the date of the crash 4that was the proximate cause of the loss of the victim's life, 5shall be mounted below the primary panel.6    (e) A fatal crash memorial marker may memorialize more 7than one victim who died as a result of the same crash. If one 8or more additional deaths subsequently occur in close 9proximity to an existing fatal crash memorial marker, the 10supporting jurisdiction may use the same marker to memorialize 11the subsequent death or deaths, by adding the names of the 12additional persons.13    (f) A fatal crash memorial marker shall be maintained 14permanently for at least 4 years from the date the last person 15was memorialized on the marker.16    (g) The supporting jurisdiction has the right to install a 17marker at a location other than the location of the crash or to 18relocate a marker due to restricted room, property owner 19complaints, interference with essential traffic control 20devices, safety concerns, or other restrictions. In these 21cases, the sponsoring jurisdiction may select an alternate 22location.23    (h) The Department shall secure the consent of any 24municipality before placing a fatal crash memorial marker 25within the corporate limits of the municipality.26    (i) A fee in an amount to be determined by the supporting   SB0199- 5 -LRB104 06067 LNS 16100 b1jurisdiction shall be charged to the qualified relative. The 2fee shall not exceed the costs associated with the 3fabrication, installation, and maintenance of the fatal crash 4memorial marker.5    (j) The provisions of this Section shall apply to any 6fatal crash marker constructed on or after January 1, 2013. 7(Source: P.A. 102-60, eff. 7-9-21; 102-982, eff. 7-1-23; 8103-82, eff. 1-1-24.)